North Dakota statutes. TITLE 13 Debtor And Creditor Relationship
CHAPTER 13-11 Debt Settlement Providers
13-11-21.
Fees.

A debt-settlement provider may not charge fees of any type or receive compensation from a consumer in a type, amount, or timing other than fees or compensation permitted in this section.

A debt-settlement provider may not charge or receive from a consumer any enrollment fee, setup fee, upfront fee of any kind, or any maintenance fee.

A debt-settlement provider may charge a settlement fee that may not exceed an amount greater than thirty percent of the savings. If the amount paid by the debt-settlement provider to the creditor or negotiated by the debt-settlement provider and paid by the consumer to the creditor pursuant to a settlement negotiated by the debt-settlement provider on behalf of the consumer as full and complete satisfaction of the creditor’s claim with regard to that debt is greater than the principal amount of the debt, the debt-settlement provider is not entitled to any settlement fee.

A debt-settlement provider may not collect any settlement fee from a consumer until a creditor enters into a legally enforceable agreement to accept funds in a specific dollar amount as full and complete satisfaction of the creditor’s claim with regard to that debt and those funds are provided by the debt-settlement provider on behalf of the consumer or are provided directly by the consumer to the creditor pursuant to a settlement negotiated by the debt-settlement provider.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 108, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Note: A False Light In The Darkness: Protecting Consumers And Creditors From The Debt Settlement Industry, 87 N.D. L. Rev. 273 (2011).

13-11-22.
Voluntary contributions.

A provider may not solicit a voluntary contribution from an individual or an affiliate of the individual for any service provided to the individual.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 108, § 3.

13-11-23.
Prohibited acts and practices.

A provider directly or indirectly may not:

Misappropriate or misapply money held in trust;

Settle a debt on behalf of an individual for more than fifty percent of the principal amount of the debt owed a creditor, unless the individual assents to the settlement after the creditor has assented;

Take a power of attorney that authorizes the provider to settle a debt;

Exercise or attempt to exercise a power of attorney after an individual has terminated a contract;

Initiate a transfer from an individual’s account at a bank or with another person unless the transfer is:

A return of money to the individual; or

Before termination of a contract, properly authorized by the contract and this chapter, and for:

Payment to one or more creditors pursuant to a plan; or

Payment of a fee;

Offer a gift or bonus, premium, reward, or other compensation to an individual for executing a contract;

Offer, pay, or give a gift or bonus, premium, reward, or other compensation to a person for referring a prospective customer, if the person making the referral has a financial interest in the outcome of debt-management services provided to the customer, unless neither the provider nor the person making the referral communicates to the prospective customer the identity of the source of the referral;

Receive a bonus, commission, or other benefit for referring an individual to a person;

Structure a plan in a manner that would result in a negative amortization of any of an individual’s debts, unless a creditor that is owed a negatively amortizing debt agrees to refund or waive the finance charge upon payment of the principal amount of the debt;

Compensate the provider’s employees on the basis of a formula that incorporates the number of individuals the employee induces to enter contracts;

Settle a debt or lead an individual to believe that a payment to a creditor is in settlement of a debt to the creditor unless, at the time of settlement, the individual receives a certification by the creditor that the payment is in full settlement of the debt or is part of a payment plan, the terms of which are included in the certification, that upon completion, will lead to full settlement of the debt;

Make a representation that:

The provider will furnish money to pay bills or prevent attachments;

Payment of a certain amount will permit satisfaction of a certain amount or range of indebtedness; or

Participation in a plan will or may prevent litigation, garnishment, attachment, repossession, foreclosure, eviction, or loss of employment;

Misrepresent that the provider is authorized or competent to furnish legal advice or perform legal services;

Represent that it is a not-for-profit entity unless the provider is organized and properly operating as a not-for-profit under the law of the state in which it was formed or that it is a tax-exempt entity unless the provider has received certification of tax-exempt status from the internal revenue service;

Take a confession of judgment or power of attorney to confess judgment against an individual; or

Employ an unfair, unconscionable, or deceptive act or practice, including the knowing omission of any material information.

If a provider furnishes debt-management services to an individual, the provider may not, directly or indirectly:

Purchase a debt or obligation of the individual;

Receive from or on behalf of the individual:

A promissory note or other negotiable instrument other than a check or a demand draft; or

A postdated check or demand draft;

Lend money or provide credit to the individual, except as a deferral of a settlement fee at no additional expense to the individual;

Obtain a mortgage or other security interest from any person in connection with the services provided to the individual;

Except as permitted by federal law, disclose the identity or identifying information of the individual or the identity of the individual’s creditors, except to:

The commissioner, upon proper demand;

A creditor of the individual, to the extent necessary to secure the cooperation of the creditor in a plan; or

The extent necessary to administer the plan;

Except as otherwise provided in section 13-11-21, provide the individual less than the full benefit of a compromise of a debt arranged by the provider;

Charge the individual for or provide credit or other insurance, coupons for goods or services, membership in a club, access to computers or the internet, or any other matter not directly related to debt-management services or educational services concerning personal finance; or

Furnish legal advice or perform legal services, unless the person furnishing that advice to or performing those services for the individual is licensed to practice law in this state.

This chapter does not authorize any person to engage in the practice of law.

A provider may not receive a gift or bonus, premium, reward, or other compensation, directly or indirectly, for advising, arranging, or assisting an individual in connection with obtaining an extension of credit or other service from a lender or service provider, except for educational or counseling services required in connection with a government-sponsored program.

Unless a person supplies goods, services, or facilities generally and supplies them to the provider at a cost no greater than the cost the person generally charges to others, a provider may not purchase goods, services, or facilities from the person if an employee or a person that the provider should reasonably know is an affiliate of the provider:

Owns more than ten percent of the person; or

Is an employee or affiliate of the person.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 108, § 3.

13-11-24.
Notice of litigation.

Within thirty days after a provider has been served with notice of a civil action for violation of this chapter by or on behalf of an individual who resides in this state at either the time of a contract or the time the notice is served, the provider shall notify the commissioner in a record that it has been sued.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 108, § 3.

13-11-25.
Liability for the conduct of other persons.

If a provider delegates any of its duties or obligations under a contract or this chapter to another person, including an independent contractor, the provider is liable for conduct of the person which, if done by the provider, would violate the contract or this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 108, § 3.

13-11-26.
Powers of the commissioner.

Insofar as consistent with other provisions of law, the commissioner may:

Determine the qualifications of all applicants based on financial responsibility, financial condition, business experience, character, and general fitness which must reasonably warrant the belief that the applicant’s business will be conducted lawfully and fairly. In determining whether this qualification is met, and for the purpose of investigating compliance with this chapter, the commissioner may review and consider the relevant business records and capital adequacy of the applicant and the competence, experience, integrity, and financial ability of a person who is a member, partner, director, officer, or twenty-five percent or more shareholder of the applicant.

Conduct investigations and make an examination of any person, whether licensed or not, who is engaged in the debt-settlement services business, including all records of such business, and to subpoena witnesses anytime the commissioner has reason to believe such is necessary. The licensee shall pay an examination or visitation fee and must be charged by the commissioner at an hourly rate to be set by the commissioner, sufficient to cover all reasonable expenses of the department associated with the examination or visitation provided for by this section. Fees must be deposited in the financial institutions regulatory fund.

Issue and serve upon any person or licensed debt-settlement provider an order to cease and desist to take corrective action when the commissioner has reason to believe the person or agency is violating, has violated, or is about to violate the provisions of this chapter. An interested party may appeal issuance of a cease and desist order under chapter 28-32 by filing written notice of appeal within twenty days after service of the order.

Deny, suspend, revoke, condition, or decline to renew a license for a violation of this chapter, rules or regulations issued under this chapter, or an order or directive entered under this chapter.

Deny, suspend, revoke, condition, or decline to renew a license if an applicant or licensee withholds information or makes a material misstatement in an application for a license or renewal of a license.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 108, § 3.

13-11-27.
Enforcement authorities, violations, and penalties.

Any person that violates this chapter is guilty of a class C felony.

The commissioner may impose a civil money penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars per violation upon a person or agency that willfully violates a law, rule, written agreement, or order under this chapter. An interested party may appeal the assessment of a civil money penalty under chapter 28-32 by filing a written notice of appeal within twenty days after service of the assessment of civil money penalties. A civil money penalty collected under this section must be paid to the state treasurer and deposited in the financial institutions regulatory fund.

The attorney general also may enforce this chapter. The attorney general, in enforcing this chapter, has all the powers provided in this chapter or chapter 51-15 and may seek all remedies in this chapter or chapter 51-15. A violation of this chapter is deemed a violation of chapter 51-15. The remedies, duties, prohibitions, and penalties of this chapter are not exclusive and are in addition to all other causes of action, remedies, and penalties under chapter 51-15, or otherwise provided by law.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 108, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Note: A False Light In The Darkness: Protecting Consumers And Creditors From The Debt Settlement Industry, 87 N.D. L. Rev. 273 (2011).

13-11-28.
Void contracts.

If a provider imposes a fee or other charge or receives money or other payments not authorized by sections 13-11-21 and 13-11-22, the contract is void and the individual may recover as provided in section 13-11-20.

If a provider is not licensed as required by this chapter when an individual assents to a contract, the contract is void.

For a void contract under subsection 2, the provider does not have a claim against the individual for breach of contract or for restitution.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 108, § 3.

13-11-29.
Private enforcement.

Any person that is aggrieved by a violation of this chapter may bring an action to enjoin the violation, or for restitution, or both. The court may award the plaintiff the plaintiff’s actual restitution or a sum up to two thousand dollars, whichever is greater. The court may award the plaintiff costs, expenses, and reasonable attorney’s fees. This section does not limit any other claims the person may have against the debt-settlement provider or any third party subject to this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 108, § 3.

13-11-30.
Confidentiality.

To promote more effective regulation and reduce regulatory burden through supervisory information sharing, the commissioner or commissioner’s designee may furnish information to or receive information from a nationwide multistate licensing system for the purpose of regulation of the financial services industry. Information furnished by the commissioner to any third party which is confidential or privileged in the commissioner’s possession remains confidential or privileged in the possession of the third party. Information received by the commissioner from any third party which is confidential or privileged in the third-party’s possession remains confidential or privileged in the commissioner’s possession.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 115, § 17.

13-11-31.
Disclosure of customer information.

Except for provisions of chapter 6-08.1 which are inconsistent with this chapter, chapter 6-08.1 applies to all debt-settlement providers licensed under this chapter.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 120, § 14, effective July 1, 2015.